North Dakota, session 69, SB2204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 47-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Disclosure of prior radon test - Immunity from liability - Definitions .
1. As used in this section:
a. "Buyer" means a person negotiating or offering to acquire real property for value or legal
or equitable title, or the right to acquire legal or equitable title to residential real property.
b. "Mitigation" means measures designed to permanently reduce indoor radon
concentrations.
c. "Seller" means a person that owns legal or equitable title to residential real property.
d. "Test" or "testing" means a measurement of indoor radon concentrations according to the
"National Radon Action Plan 2021-2025", published by the environmental protection
agency .
2. Before executing an agreement to sell or transfer residential real property, except as otherwise
provided in an offer to execute a purchase agreement, a seller shall disclose in writing to the
buyer any knowledge the seller has of radon concentrations in the property. The seller or
seller's agent shall provide the following disclosure statement to the buyer, and the buyer shall
acknowledge its receipt by signing a copy of the disclosure statement:
RADON GAS IS A NATURALLY OCCURRING RADIOACTIVE GAS THAT, WHEN IT
HAS ACCUMULATED IN A BUILDING IN SUFFICIENT QUANTITIES, MAY PRESENT
HEALTH RISKS TO PERSONS WHO ARE EXPOSED TO IT OVER TIME. LEVELS OF
RADON THAT EXCEED FEDERAL GUIDELINES HAVE BEEN FOUND IN BUILDINGS
ON RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY IN NORTH DAKOTA. ADDITIONAL
INFORMATION REGARDING RADON AND RADON TESTING MAY BE OBTAINED
FROM YOUR LOCAL PUBLIC HEALTH UNIT OR THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF
ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY.
3. If the seller has knowledge the property previously has undergone testing for radon gas and
radon progeny, the seller shall provide a copy of test results reasonably available to or in the
seller's possession and evidence of mitigation to the buyer before executing an agreement to
sell or transfer the property. Any test result or evidence of mitigation furnished under this
section does not constitute a promise, warranty, or representation by the seller or the seller's
agent that the test results are accurate or the mitigation is effective.
4. This section does not create a contingency on the purchase of the property or any right to
rescind a contract for purchase unless the contingency or right to rescind is an express term of
the contract.

S. B. NO. 2204 - PAGE 2
5. A seller or seller's agent complying with this section is not liable for any claim or action based
on the presence of radon gas or radon progeny found in the residential real property subject to
disclosure under this section.

S. B. NO. 2204 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2204.
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 3 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State